District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0791.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Extension of Substance Use and Targeted Outreach Grants Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 5120e of the Department of Behavioral Health Establishment Act of 2013,
effective July 18, 2026 (D.C. Law 26-142; D.C. Official Code § 7-1143.02), is amended by
adding a new subsection (g) to read as follows:
“(g)(1) Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, and subject to the availability of
funds, the Department shall issue grants in Fiscal Year 2027 to the organizations that received
grants in Fiscal Year 2026 pursuant to the Substance Use and Behavioral Health Services
Targeted Outreach Grant Act of 2025, effective December 6, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-55; D.C.
Official Code § 7-1141.01, note) (“grantees”), for the purpose of continuing to provide direct
support, relationship development, and resource brokering to individuals in need of substance
use and behavioral health services at:
“(A) The vicinity and related geography of the 600 block of T Street, NW
in Wards 1 and 2;
“(B) The vicinity and related geography of the 1300-1700 blocks of North
Capitol Street, NW, and 1600-1700 blocks of Lincoln, Road, NE in Ward 5;
“(C) The vicinity and related geography of the King Greenleaf Recreation
Center, located at 201 N Street, SW in Ward 6; and
“(D) Ward 1 Community Navigator sites at the following locations:
“(i) Columbia Heights Civil Plaza;
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(ii) The intersection of Mount Pleasant Street, NW, and Kenyon
Street, NW;
“(iii) Georgia Avenue, NW, between New Hampshire Avenue,
NW, and Harvard Street, NW; and
“(iv) U Street, NW, between 14th Street, NW, and Georgia
Avenue, NW.”.
“(2) The Department may issue grant awards for services at additional locations.”.
Sec. 3. Section 5012 of the Opioid Abatement Fund Establishment Act of 2022, effective
September 21, 2022 (D.C. Law 24-167; D.C. Official Code § 7-3221), is amended by adding a
new subsection (b-8) to read as follows:
“(b-8) In Fiscal Year 2027 and subject to funding available in the Fund, the Fund shall be
used to reissue grants to all Fiscal Year 2026 grantee organizations awarded grants pursuant to
the Substance Use and Behavioral Health Services Targeted Outreach Grant Act of 2025,
effective December 6, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-55;D.C. Official Code § 7-1141.01, note), for the
purposes described in section 5120e(g)(1) of the Department of Behavioral Health Establishment
Act of 2013, effective July 18, 2026 (D.C. Law 26-142; D.C. Official Code § 7-1143.02(g)(1)).”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3